Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-240
Certificate of limited partnership; contents; filing.

(a) In order to form a limited partnership, all persons who initially will be the general partners shall execute a certificate of limited partnership. The certificate shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and set forth:

(1) The name of the limited partnership;

(2) The address of its office and the name and street address and post office box number, if any, of the agent for service of process required to be maintained by section 67-236;

(3) The name and the business, residence, or mailing address of each general partner; and

(4) Any other matters the partners determine to include therein.

(b) A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership in the office of the Secretary of State or at any later time specified in the certificate of limited partnership if, in either case, there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB383, § 2.